Nevada, session 83, SB2.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 288.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.220 The following proceedings, required by or pursuant to
this chapter, are not subject to any provision of NRS which requires
a meeting to be open or public:
-
*SB2*

– 2 –
1. [Any negotiation or informal discussion between a local
government employer and an employee organization or employees
as individuals, whether conducted by the governing body or through
a representative or representatives.
2. Any meeting of a mediator with either party or both parties
to a negotiation.
3. Any meeting or investigation conducted by a fact finder.
4.] Any meeting of the governing body of a local government
employer with its management representative or representatives.
[5.] 2. Deliberations of the Board toward a decision on a
complaint, appeal or petition for declaratory relief.
Sec. 2. NRS 288.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.590 [The following proceedings, required by or conducted
pursuant to this chapter, are not subject to any provision of NRS
which requires a meeting to be open or public:
1. Any negotiation or informal discussion between the
Executive Department and a labor organization or employees as
individuals.
2. Any meeting of a mediator with either party or both parties
to a negotiation.
3. Any meeting or investigation conducted by an arbitrator.
4.] Deliberations of the Board toward a decision on a
complaint, appeal or petition for declaratory relief [.] are not subject
to any provision of NRS which requires a meeting to be open or
public.
H
-
*SB2*